Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5295.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 11-9 of the General Laws entitled "Children" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following section:
11-9-22. Care of babies born preterm.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, any physician, nurse, or other
licensed medical person who knowingly and intentionally fails to provide reasonable medical care
and treatment to an infant born alive, as described in subsection (c) of this section, shall:
(1) Be guilty of a felony and upon conviction shall be fined not exceeding five thousand
dollars ($5,000), or imprisoned not exceeding five (5) years, or both; and
(2) If, as a result of that failure, the infant dies, shall be guilty of the crime of manslaughter.
(b) The requirements of this section shall not be construed to prevent an infant's parent(s)
or guardian(s) from refusing to give consent to medical treatment or care which is not medically
necessary or reasonable, including care or treatment which either:
(1) Is not necessary to save the life of the infant;
(2) Has a potential risk to the infant's life or health that outweighs the potential benefit to
the infant of the treatment or care; or
(3) Is treatment that will do no more than temporarily prolong the act of dying when death
is imminent.
(c) As used in this section, the term "born alive," with respect to a member of the species
homo sapiens, means the complete expulsion or extraction from the mother of that member, at any

stage of development, who after such expulsion or extraction breathes or has a beating heart,
pulsation of the umbilical cord, or definite movement of voluntary muscles, regardless of whether
the umbilical cord has been cut, and regardless of whether the expulsion or extraction occurs as a
result of natural or induced labor, cesarean section, or by any other means.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000667
========
LC000667 - Page 2 of 3